Foma/grammars/finish.foma
# finnish-ot-verification.foma

# Parts Copyright (C) 2016 Mans Hulden
# Parts Copyright (C) 2004 Lauri Karttunen

# This is the complete program code that performs a "formal comparison"
# of three accounts of Finnish prosody as documented in the paper:

# Hulden, M. (2017). "Formal and Computational Verification of Phonological Analyses". Phonology 34.

# Run with foma	-l finnish-ot-verification.foma

# The three accounts are:

# (1) Lauri Karttunen's implementation of the "traditional" analysis = Karttunen
# (2) Paul Kiparsky's (2003) OT analysis = Kiparsky
# (3) Nine Elenbaas's (1999) OT analysis = Elenbaas

# The formal verification re-uses LK's existing code for the traditional analysis
# and also part of the markup used in his implementation of (2) and (3).
# A fourth "provably correct" OT analysis is also provided, together
# with an equivalence proof.  That grammar only changes one constraint *(LH)
# in Elenbaas' analysis.

# The comments below are prefixed LK or MH to signal who wrote them.

# As the original program code, this is released under the GPL:

# This program is free software; you can redistribute it and/or modify
# it under the terms of GNU General Public License as published by
# the Free Software Foundation; either version 2 of the License, or
# (at your option) any later version.
#   This program is distributed in the hope that it will be useful,
#   but WITHOUT ANY WARRANTY; without even the implied warranty of
#   MERCHANTABILITY or FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE.  See the
#   GNU General Public License for more details.

#######################################################################
# MH: Part 1: compiles LK's "traditional" analysis with minor changes #
#     creating a transducer called "Karttunen" (section 7.1.2)        #
#######################################################################

def HighV [u | y | i];                  # LK: High vowel
def MidV  [e | o | ö];                  # LK: Mid vowel
def LowV  [a | ä] ;                     # LK: Low vowel
def USV   [HighV | MidV | LowV];        # LK: Unstressed Vowel

define C [b | c | d | f | g | h | j | k | l | m |
          n | p | q | r | s | t | v | w | x | z];  # LK: Consonant

def MSV [á | é | í | ó | ú | ý | "ä́" | "ö́"];   # MH: vowel with main stress
def SSV [à | è | ì | ò | ù | "ỳ" | "ä̀" | "ö̀"]; # MH: vowel with sec. stress
def SV [MSV | SSV];                     # LK: Stressed vowel
def V [USV | SV] ;                      # LK: Vowel

def P [V | C];                          # LK: Phone
def B [[\P+] | .#.];                    # LK: Boundary
def E .#. | ".";                        # LK: Edge
def SB [~$"." "." ~$"."];               # LK: At most one syllable boundary

def Light [C* V];                       # LK: Light syllable
def Heavy [Light P+];                   # LK: Heavy syllable

def S [Heavy | Light];                  # LK: Syllable
def SS [S & $SV];                       # LK: Stressed syllable
def US [S & ~$SV];                      # LK: Unstressed syllable
def MSS [S & $MSV] ;                    # LK: Syllable with main stress

def BF [S "." S];                       # LK: Binary foot

def MarkNonDiphthongs [ [..] -> "." || [HighV | MidV] _ LowV,     # i.a, e.a
                                           i _ [MidV - e],        # i.o, i.ö
                                           u _ [MidV - o],        # u.e
                                           y _ [MidV - ö] ];      # y.e

def Syllabify C* V+ C* @-> ... "." || _ C V ;
def TernaryFeet BF "." Light @-> "(" ... ")"
                                    // [{).} | .#.] [BF "."]*  _
                                       ["." Heavy "." S ] | .#. ;

# LK: Scan all the unfooted material into binary feet.
def BinaryFeet BF @-> "(" ... ")" || .#.|"." _ .#.|".";

# LK: Assign the primary stress to the first vowel of the first syllable.
# MH: I've modified this to also stress monosyllabic words which aren't
#     footed.  This in order to produce equivalence with the OT grammars.

def MainStress a -> á, e -> é, i -> í, o -> ó,
               u -> ú, y -> ý, ä -> "ä́", ö -> "ö́" || .#. "(" C* _ , .#. C* _ V* C* .#.;

# LK: Assign secondary stress to all initial vowels of non-initial syllables.
def SecondaryStress a -> à, e -> è, i -> ì, o -> ò,
                    u -> ù, y -> "ỳ", ä -> "ä̀", ö -> "ö̀" || "(" C* _ ;

# LK: Assign an optional secondary stress to an unfooted final syllable
# if it is heavy.
def OptFinalStress a (->) à, e (->) è, i (->) ì,
                   o (->) ò, u (->) ù, y (->) "ỳ",
                   ä (->) "ä̀", ö (->) "ö̀" || "." C* _ P .#.;

# MH: We'll use the Collapse transducer later to convert all the footed
#     and stressed material into words over the alphabet {L,H,Ĺ,H́}
#     for ease of analysis

def Collapse [Heavy &  $SV]  -> H́ || E _ E ,,
             [Heavy & ~$SV]  -> H || E _ E ,,
             [Light &  $SV]  -> Ĺ || E _ E ,,
             [Light & ~$SV]  -> L || E _ E ;

# MH: We combine everything, making sure that the input side can contain only
# unstressed Finnish letters (otherwise our formal comparisons won't work)

def Karttunen [[C|USV]* & $USV] .o. [ MarkNonDiphthongs
                        .o.
                     Syllabify
                        .o.
                     TernaryFeet
                        .o.
                     BinaryFeet
                        .o.
                     MainStress
                        .o.
                    SecondaryStress
#                        .o.
#                    OptFinalStress
                    ];

# MH: uncomment above to get opt final stress (which OT doesn't model)

def KarttunenCollapsed  [Karttunen .o. %(|%) -> 0 .o. Collapse .o. "." -> 0].l;

###################################################################
# MH: Part 2: compiles three OT analyses (section 7.1.3)          #
#             (1) Kiparsky                                        #
#             (2) Elenbaas                                        #
#             (3) OtNew = fixed version of Elenbaas (7.1.4)       #
###################################################################

# MH: The ranking for all are the same. They only differ in one constraint.
# (1) MainStress >> Clash >> AlignLeft >> FootBin >> Lapse >> NonFinal >>
#     StressToWeight >> Parse-σ >> All-Feet-Left
# (2) MainStress >> Clash >> AlignLeft >> FootBin >> Lapse >> NonFinal >>
#     *(ĹH) >> Parse-σ >> All-Feet-Left
# (3) MainStress >> Clash >> AlignLeft >> FootBin >> Lapse >> NonFinal >>
#     *(LH)... >> Parse-σ >> All-Feet-Left

# This part reuses most of the definitions from the above rule-based analysis.

# MH: assign stress arbitrarily (used for the Gen transducer)
def Stress a (->) á|à, e (->) é|è, i (->) í|ì, o (->) ó|ò,
              u (->) ú|ù, y (->) ý|ỳ, ä (->) ä́ | ä̀ , ö (->) ö́ | ö̀  || E C* _ ;
# MH: assign feet arbitrarily (used in Gen)
def Scan [[S ("." S ("." S)) & $SS] (->) "(" ... ")" || E _ E] ;

# MH: This is Gen. Note that Gen has a syllabifier pre-built into it saving
#     us the trouble of coming up with syllabification constraints and
#     allowing us to focus on the prosody.
#     We also filter the input side to only accept unstressed Finnish
#     letter sequences (we did the same above for Karttunen) in order for our
#     formal equivalence tests to work (this forces the domain of all
#     transducers to be equivalent).

def Gen [[C|USV]* .o. MarkNonDiphthongs .o. Syllabify .o. Stress .o. Scan];

###########################
# Constraint markup rules #
###########################

# MH: MainStress can be assumed to be an unviolable constraint:
#     main stress always falls on the first syllable
def MainStress [B MSS ~$MSS];

# LK: Clash: No stress on adjacent syllables.
def Clash SS -> ... {*} || SS B _ ;

# LK: Align-Left: The stressed syllable is initial in the foot.
def AlignLeft SV -> ... {*} || .#. ~[?* "(" C*] _ ;

# LK: Foot-Bin: Feet are minimally bimoraic and maximally bisyllabic.
def FootBin ["(" Light ")" | "(" S ["." S]^>1] -> ... {*} ;

# LK: Lapse: Every unstressed syllable must be adjacent to a stressed
# syllable or the word edge.
def Lapse US -> ... {*} || [B US B] _ [B US B];

# LK: Non-Final: The final syllable is not stressed.
def NonFinal SS -> ... {*} || _ ~$S .#.;

# LK: Stress-To-Weight: Stressed syllables are heavy.
def StressToWeight [SS & Light] -> ... {*} || _ ")" | E;

# MH: LH (used by Elenbaas), avoid *(Ĺ.H)-feet
def LHfoot %( Light "." Heavy %) ;
def LH     [..] -> {*} || LHfoot   _ ;

# MH: the modified LH-constraint that fixes the grammar to achieve
#     equivalence with the traditional analysis *(LH)...:
#     no non-final LH-feet.
def LH2    [..] -> {*} || LHfoot ? _ ;

# LK: License-σ: Syllables are parsed into feet.
def Parse S -> ... {*} || E _ E;

# LK: All-Ft-Left: Every foot starts at the beginning of a
#     prosodic word.
# MH: This can't be modeled with the current OT approach by marking up
#     violations with *, since it's a gradient constraint.  Instead, we'll
#     simulate it below with a worsening transducer, and we can tell the
#     simulation is exact by doing "test functional" on the resulting
#     Kiparsky and Elenbaas transducers.

# MH: AddViol adds a violation marker to each candidate
def AddViol   [?* 0:"*" ?*]+;

# MH: Permute moves the markers around (needed for Stress-To-Weight)
def Permute   [?* ["*":0 \"*"* 0:"*"|0:"*" \"*"* "*":0]* ?*]*;

# MH: a helper to undo/redo stress marks
def Str  a (->) á|à, e (->) é|è, i (->) í|ì, o (->) ó|ò, u (->) ú|ù,
         y (->) ý|ỳ, ä (->) ä́ | ä̀ , ö (->) ö́ | ö̀ ;

# MH: The Worsen transducer undoes the stress markings, redoes them
#     arbitrarily, removes syllable and foot markup, adds at least one
#     violation, a redoes syllable and foot markup arbitrarily.

def Markup %( | %) | %.;
def Worsen Str.i .o. Str .o. Markup -> 0 .o. AddViol .o. 0 -> Markup;

# MH: Eval is a wrapper for evaluating a single constraint.
# MH: EvalP1 is identical, except it also permutes markers after adding them.
def Eval(X)     X .o. ~[[X .o. Worsen].l] .o. {*} -> 0;
def EvalP1(X)   X .o. ~[[X .o. Worsen .o. Permute].l] .o. {*} -> 0 ;

# MH: WorsenFeet is used for the simulation of the gradient constraint
#     All-Feet-Left. First, we remove right parentheses and syllable boundaries
#     then we (1) add a left parenthesis or (2) move one rightward, or (3) both
#     one or more times.  This allows us to, from candidates like (1), create
#     the suboptimal candidates (2) and (3).

#       (1) > (jä́r.jes).(tèl.mäl).(lìs.tä).mä.(tö̀n.tä)
#       (2)   (jä́r.jes).(tèl.mäl).lis.(tä̀.mä).(tö̀n.tä)
#       (3)   (jä́r.jes).tel.(mä̀l.lis).(tä̀.mä).(tö̀n.tä)

def WorsenFeet %)|%. -> 0 .o. [?+ 0:%( [?|0:%(]*] | [?* [%(:0 ?+ 0:%(] ?*]+ .o.
               0 -> %)|%. .o. Str.i .o. Str;

# MH: A macro to handle the All-Feet-Left worsening elegantly.
def EvalAllFeetLeft(X) X .o. ~[X .o. WorsenFeet].l ;

# MH: Here we define the main OT transducers which capture the entire
#     grammar, mapping input forms in Finnish to footed, stressed, and
#     syllabified output forms. We also define versions that only contain the
#     stress markings to be able to compare with the rule-based analysis which
#     uses different footings by allowing for "ternary" feet.

#     The EvalP1 is used for the Stress-To-Weight constraint. The way we know
#     that it is necessary and sufficient is by compiling the constraints up
#     to that point, maintaining the violations, then composing with
#     \"*" -> 0, and issuing "test functional", which yielded functional
#     for one permutation, and non-functional for no permutations.

def Kiparsky  EvalAllFeetLeft(Eval(EvalP1(Eval(Eval(Eval(Eval(Eval(
              Gen .o. MainStress .o. Clash) .o. AlignLeft) .o. FootBin)
              .o. Lapse) .o. NonFinal) .o. StressToWeight) .o. Parse));

def KiparskyS [Kiparsky .o. Markup -> 0];
